apertium-pol.pol.dix
<pardef n="/oko__n">
  <e>       <p><l>oko</l>       <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oka</l>       <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oku</l>       <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oko</l>       <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okiem</l>     <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oku</l>       <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oko</l>       <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oczy</l>      <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oczu</l>      <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ócz</l>       <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oczom</l>     <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oczy</l>      <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oczami</l>    <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oczyma</l>    <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oczach</l>    <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oczy</l>      <r>oko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="woj/na__n">
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ny</l>        <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nie</l>       <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nę</l>        <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ną</l>        <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nie</l>       <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>no</l>        <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ny</l>        <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nom</l>       <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ny</l>        <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nami</l>      <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nach</l>      <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ny</l>        <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bru/zda__n">
  <e>       <p><l>zda</l>       <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zdy</l>       <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ździe</l>     <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zdę</l>       <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zdą</l>       <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ździe</l>     <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zdo</l>       <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zdy</l>       <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zd</l>        <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zdom</l>      <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zdy</l>       <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zdami</l>     <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zdach</l>     <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zdy</l>       <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="poł/owa__n">
  <e>       <p><l>owa</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owy</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owie</l>      <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owę</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ową</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owie</l>      <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owo</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owy</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owy</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ów</l>        <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owom</l>      <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owy</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owami</l>     <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owach</l>     <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owy</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="k/oza__n">
  <e>       <p><l>oza</l>       <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozy</l>       <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozie</l>      <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozę</l>       <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozą</l>       <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozie</l>      <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozo</l>       <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozy</l>       <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozy</l>       <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>óz</l>        <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozom</l>      <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozy</l>       <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozami</l>     <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozach</l>     <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozy</l>       <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="oko">             <i></i><par n="/oko__n"/></e>
<e lm="bawełna">         <i>baweł</i><par n="woj/na__n"/></e>
<e lm="brzoza">          <i>brz</i><par n="k/oza__n"/></e>
<e lm="budowa">          <i>bud</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="głowa">           <i>gł</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="koza">            <i>k</i><par n="k/oza__n"/></e>
<e lm="krowa">           <i>kr</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="mowa">            <i>m</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="obudowa">         <i>obud</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="odbudowa">        <i>odbud</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="odmowa">          <i>odm</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="osnowa">          <i>osn</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="pizda">           <i>pi</i><par n="bru/zda__n"/></e>
<e lm="podkowa">         <i>podk</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="połowa">          <i>poł</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="rozmowa">         <i>rozm</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="sowa">            <i>s</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="umowa">           <i>um</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="wdowa">           <i>wd</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="wojna">           <i>woj</i><par n="woj/na__n"/></e>
<e lm="wymowa">          <i>wym</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="przemowa">        <i>przem</i><par n="poł/owa__n"/></e>
